District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.111

Authorized delegation of authority.

To the extent permitted by District and federal laws, the Mayor may delegate to any Authorized Delegate the performance of any function authorized to be performed by the Mayor under this subchapter.

History

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 11, 52 DCR 8093